Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Fiscal Advisor and Fiscal Advisory Council
[Repealed]

§ 31-17-71.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1985, ch. 469, § 5, eff from and after April 4, 1985.

§31-17-71. [En Laws, 1978, ch. 478, § 4]

§ 31-17-73.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 339, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§31-17-73. [En Laws, 1978, ch. 478, § 5]